New York, session 2025-2026, S4402.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 8-a of section 355 of the education law, as 2 amended by section 8 of part Q of chapter 56 of the laws of 2013, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 8-a. All monies received by state university health care facilities 5 from fees, charges, and reimbursement and from all other sources shall 6 be credited to a state university health care account in a fund to be 7 designated by the state comptroller. Notwithstanding the provision of 8 any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, a portion of such monies 9 credited may be transferred to a state university account as requested 10 by the state university chancellor or [his or her] their designee. 11 Monies to establish reserves for long-term expenses of state university 12 health care facilities and to fulfill obligations required for any 13 contract for health care services authorized pursuant to subdivision 14 sixteen of this section may be designated by the state university as a 15 reserve and transferred to a separate contractual reserve account. The 16 amounts in such accounts shall be available for use in accordance with 17 paragraph b of subdivision four and subdivision eight of this section. 18 Monies shall only be expended from the state university health care 19 account and the contractual reserve account pursuant to appropriation. 20 Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the state finance law or 21 any other law to the contrary, such appropriations shall remain in full 22 force and effect for two years from the effective date of the appropri- 23 ation act making the appropriation. Monies so transferred may be 24 returned to the state university health care account; provided, however, 25 that funds in such contractual reserve account must be sufficient to EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08573-01-5 S. 4402 2 1 meet the obligations of all such contracts. Notwithstanding any other 2 law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, no state agency or state offi- 3 cial or employee acting in their official capacity, may transfer, loan, 4 or otherwise appropriate any income or funds impacting, involving, 5 generated by, or appropriated for any component of the state university, 6 or community colleges as defined by section sixty-three hundred one of 7 this chapter operating under the program of the state university, 8 including such income or funds impacting, involving, generated by, or 9 appropriated for a state university health care facility, to the general 10 fund or any other fund or account held within the auspices of the comp- 11 troller of the state of New York, for prepayment, repayment, or other- 12 wise recompense for debt service costs related to a state university 13 health care facility. The provisions of this subdivision shall supersede 14 any other general, special or local law inconsistent therewith notwith- 15 standing, unless this section is expressly and specifically referred to 16 in such other general, special or local law. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.